Hawaii statutes.
§334-6 Fees; payment of expenses for
treatment services. (a) Pursuant to chapter 91, the director shall
establish reasonable charges for treatment services and may make collections on
such charges. In making the collections on such charges the director shall
take into consideration the financial circumstances of the patient and the
patient’s family including a reciprocal beneficiary, and no collections shall
be made where in the judgment of the director, such collections would tend to
make the patient or the patient’s family including a reciprocal beneficiary, a
public charge or deprive the patient and the patient’s family including a
reciprocal beneficiary, of necessary support.

(b) Every person hospitalized at a psychiatric
facility or receiving treatment services through a community mental health
center under the jurisdiction of the State or a county, or at a psychiatric
facility or through a community mental health center which derives more than
fifty per cent of its revenues from the general fund of the State, or pursuant
to contract with the director under section 334-2.5, shall be liable for the
expenses attending their reception, maintenance, and treatment and any property
not exempt from execution belonging to the person shall be subject to sequestration
for the payment of the expenses. Every parent or legal guardian of a patient
who is a minor and every spouse or reciprocal beneficiary of a patient shall be
liable for the expenses attending the reception, maintenance, and treatment of
that minor child or spouse or reciprocal beneficiary who is hospitalized at a
psychiatric facility or receiving treatment through a community mental health
center under the jurisdiction of the State or a county, or at a psychiatric
facility or through a community mental health center which derives more than
fifty per cent of its revenues from the general fund of the State, or pursuant
to contract with the director under section 334-2.5. [L 1967, c 259, pt of §1;
HRS §334-6; am L 1971, c 153, §1; am L 1972, c 80, §1; am L 1991, c 243, §2;
gen ch 1992; am L 1997, c 383, §44; am L 1999, c 119, §5]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next